udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N2 0 ъёсмес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсме [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмес [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстэ [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстэс [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссэ [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссэс [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёслэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # род.п.
SFX N2 0 ослэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёслэн [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыдлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осызлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсылэн [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыдлэн [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсызлэн [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмылэн [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстылэн [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссылэн [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёслэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # разд.п.
SFX N2 0 ослэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёслэсь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыдлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осызлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыдлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсызлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёслы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # дат.п.
SFX N2 0 ослы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёслы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыдлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осызлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсылы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыдлы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсызлы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмылы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстылы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссылы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # лиш.п.
SFX N2 0 остэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёстэк [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыдтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осызтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсытэк [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыдтэк [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсызтэк [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмытэк [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстытэк [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссытэк [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # соотв.п.
SFX N2 0 осъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсъя [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыдъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осызъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсыя [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыдъя [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсызъя [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмыя [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстыя [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссыя [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсын [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX N2 0 осын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсын [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п.
SFX N2 0 ъёсынымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсынызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осыным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осынымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осынызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсыным [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсынымы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыныд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыныды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыныз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсынызы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсам [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # местн.п. + входн.п
SFX N2 0 ъёсамы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсад [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсады [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсаз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсазы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осам [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осамы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осад [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осады [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осаз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осазы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсам [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсамы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсад [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсады [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсаз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсазы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # входн.п.
SFX N2 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # исходн.п.
SFX N2 0 осысь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсысь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтым [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтыды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осысьтым [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтыды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтым [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтымы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтыд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтыды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтыз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтызы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысен [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # отдал.п.
SFX N2 0 осысен [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсысен [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысеным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX N2 0 ъёсысенымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысеныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысеныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысеныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысенызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осысеным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысенымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысеныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысеныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысеныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысенызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсысеным [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысенымы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысеныд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысеныды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысеныз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысенызы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсэтӥ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # перех.п.
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осэтӥ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсэтӥ [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥ [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥм [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] 
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥзы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 остӥм [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥзы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥм [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥмы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥзы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёслань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # направ.п.
SFX N2 0 ослань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёслань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдлань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызлань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыдлань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осызлань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсылань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыдлань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсызлань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмылань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстылань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссылань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # предельн.п.
SFX N2 0 осозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсозь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
