udm.dic
напсӥ/A1A2N2
куальтра/D1A1A2N2
автомотриса/N1N2
алейрометр/N1N2
анаболики/N1N2
антропоноз/N1N2
арте/N1N2
афина/N1N2
барракуда/N1N2
биолит/N1N2
бракёр/N1N2
вагранка/N1N2
вигонь/N1N2
гальванотропизм/N1N2
генералитет/N1N2
гильберт/N1N2
гомоталлизм/N1N2
дарбар/N1N2
дефекат/N1N2
диптанк/N1N2
дукат/N1N2
изабелла/N1N2
инсайд/N1N2
каблограмма/N1N2
капрал/N1N2
квершлаг/N1N2
клип/N1N2
компендий/N1N2
корд/N1N2
крупон/N1N2
ландскнехт/N1N2
линотрон/N1N2
маздеизм/N1N2
махе/N1N2
метода/N1N2
мицелла/N1N2
мутаген/N1N2
нигрол/N1N2
оксигениум/N1N2
остинато/N1N2
параллелизм/N1N2
пентагон/N1N2
пионефроз/N1N2
полиамид/N1N2
прерафаэлит/N1N2
протромбин/N1N2
ранет/N1N2
репатриант/N1N2
роялизм/N1N2
секстет/N1N2
синдикализм/N1N2
соленоид/N1N2
стартер/N1N2
сульфат/N1N2
тандем/N1N2
тирада/N1N2
триклиний/N1N2
универсум/N1N2
феногенетика/N1N2
флат/N1N2
франшиза/N1N2
химозин/N1N2
циан/N1N2
швиц/N1N2
штрудель/N1N2
элевон/N1N2
эпифеномен/N1N2
абентурын/N2
адӟытон/N2
азькӧчер/N2
акробатка/N2
алясь/N2R1
аптечка/N2
асабаяськон/N2
афелий/N2
бадьпукуар/N2
бамлы/N2
бачкон/N2
берка/N2
биолог/N2
бӧлиськон/N2
брикет/N2
буква/N2
бурсон/N2
быдтӥськылон/N2
бычыян/N2
валбака/N2
вандытон/N2
вашкалакыл/N2
вереттодос/N2
визьмалпан/N2
виръюисьнумыр/N2
вождь/N2
вӧйсыр/N2
вормытъяськон/N2
вуанай/N2
вукочи/N2
вучонари/N2
вылсӥ/N2
гадькельгет/N2
геофизика/N2
гичул/N2
гондыргуби/N2
горон/N2
губыртылон/N2
гуретылон/N2
гылскон/N2
дардан/N2
джемпер/N2
долӟытылон/N2
дунневаась/N2
дыж/N2
евровидени/N2
ёрмылон/N2
желе/N2
ӝозтурын/N2
ӝуподон/N2
задоръяськылон/N2
ӟардэктылон/N2
зӥбломытон/N2
золомылон/N2
ӟудытон/N2
ӟушкын/N2
зэребей/N2
изьы/N2
инсценировка/N2
исьнер/N2
йӧнатскылон/N2
йырберыктонтурын/N2
йырчукинскон/N2
калакнянь/N2
канделемет/N2
карбон/N2A1A2
катер/N2
кекан/N2
керӟегъяськытон/N2
кивалтытон/N2
кионвиись/N2
кисьтонсэбед/N2
кобы/N2
кӧлаллян/N2
комментарий/N2
коньыгубиян/N2
корос/N2A1A2
кӧт/N2
кочатӥськон/N2
кружок/N2
куаретытон/N2
кудьыран/N2
куймо/N2
кулючан/N2
кургон/N2
курытгуби/N2
кучери/N2
кызамак/N2
кылем-мылемез/N2
кымаськылон/N2
кыртаракан/N2
кыштыртон/N2
лапкомытылон/N2
лем/N2
липытон/N2
лоргетон/N2
лулчеберлык/N2
лызшыргуби/N2
лэчытверан/N2
мадькыл/N2
манеръяськылон/N2
машинка/N2
мертан/N2
минерал/N2
мӧль/N2
мугылёк/N2
мунчо/N2
мушпуктон/N2
мыньпотылон/N2
намеран/N2
нелькытон/N2
ниньдор/N2
нумырбинет/N2
ныросан/N2
нюлэскузё/N2
обид/N2
огъян/N2
ӧлексы/N2
ориентировка/N2
ӧтчамчи/N2
палгытъян/N2
паньыръян/N2
паськытомылон/N2
пелейӧтон/N2
пересадка/N2
пивылэс/N2
пистолет/N2
плейстоцен/N2
подсумок/N2
полонинъёс/N2
поръяллян/N2
праник/N2
промышленность/N2
пужыятъян/N2
пумоло/N2
пурыськысъем/N2
пыдескупыри/N2
пыль/N2
пьянча/N2
распорядок/N2
розыск/N2
сайкатъян/N2
саплягуби/N2
сектала/N2
сёр/N2A1A2
сӥльвир/N2
сираллян/N2
слогвисъян/N2
спичка-коробка/N2
сузы/N2
суралтылон/N2
сыркомон/N2
сьӧсёмылон/N2
сюлыӵӧж/N2
сяртчыгу/N2
тамакчи/N2
тематика/N2
товар/N2
тӧл-зор/N2
торфяник/N2
тугун/N2
тумошо-адӟон/N2
тутыгем/N2
тынышон/N2
тэльатас/N2
тямысчур/N2
ужрадъян/N2
уйылӥськон/N2
ултӥяллян/N2
урдсӥнскон/N2
усыкмытъян/N2
ушъянэс/N2
формалист/N2
целлофан/N2A1A2
чаклан-эскерон/N2
чачага/N2
чер-каб/N2
чигыр/N2
ӵогаськытъян/N2
чорыг-танка/N2
чузась/N2
чупырскон/N2
ӵыжатон/N2
шабала/N2A1A2
шапыртылон/N2
шепертытон/N2
шовинист/N2
шорӟиськылон/N2
шуг-лек/N2
шундыйӧлтурын/N2
шыгыръян/N2
ыбонпась/N2
ырос/N2
экспонат/N2
эмъян/N2
эстонка/N2
юзмаллян/N2
юртӵӧж/N2
ярандак/N2
аир/N7N2
баскетболистка/N7N2
бронетехника/N7N2
водевиль/N7N2
геройство/N7N2
громада/N7N2
доброхот/N7N2
жилец/N7N2
золота/N7N2
канцелярист/N7N2
койне/N7N2
кромка/N7N2
любовь/N7N2
молотобоец/N7N2
недооценка/N7N2
октоих/N7N2
патронка/N7N2
поварня/N7N2
порча/N7N2
производитель/N7N2
распечатка/N7N2
самострел/N7N2
скалолаз/N7N2
социолог/N7N2
стратег/N7N2
телик/N7N2
уборки/N7N2
форточник/N7N2
черпалка/N7N2
электроток/N7N2
аудиописьмо/N7N2
госрезерв/N7N2
музтеатр/N7N2
скайп/N7N2
шпалорезка/N7N2
ваньмем/R1N2
ӟардэм/R1N2
кузпалъяськем/R1N2
наштаськем/R1N2
серекъяськись/R1N2
ужбергатӥсь/R1N2
шонерскем/R1N2
вакчиятэт/N2 # С.М.
тӧдьмет/N2 # С.М.
